New York, session 2025-2026, S8096.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. On and after the effective date of this act, a public 2 employer shall be prohibited from diminishing the health insurance bene- 3 fits provided to retirees, who retired before, on or after the effective 4 date of this act, and their dependents or the contributions such employ- 5 er makes for such health insurance coverage below the level of such 6 benefits or contributions made on behalf of such retirees and their 7 dependents by such employer as of the retiree's date of retirement. For 8 the purpose of this act, "public employer" shall mean any professional 9 police and fire fighter in the state of New York. 10 § 2. Nothing contained in this act shall supersede or diminish the 11 terms of a collective bargaining agreement. 12 § 3. Notwithstanding the provisions of section one of this act to the 13 contrary, a public employer shall be prohibited from diminishing the 14 health insurance benefits provided to retirees who retire after the 15 effective date of this act from positions not subject to collective 16 bargaining agreement and their dependents, or contributions such employ- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13145-02-6 S. 8096--A 2 1 er makes for such health insurance coverage, below the level of such 2 benefits or contributions made on behalf of active employees in such 3 positions as of the retiree's date of retirement. 4 § 4. Nothing contained in this act shall require a public employer 5 which does not provide health insurance benefits to retirees and their 6 dependents as of the effective date of this act to offer such benefits. 7 § 5. This act shall take effect January 1, 2027; provided, however, if 8 this act shall become a law after such date it shall take effect imme- 9 diately and shall be deemed to have been in full force and effect on and 10 after January 1, 2027.